Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB923.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 116.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person may register as a voter during the period registration is open if he or she
possesses, or will possess on the day of the next regular election, the qualifications
set forth in KRS 116.025.
(2) The county clerk shall cause all registration to be closed the fourth Tuesday
preceding through the first Monday following any primary or general election, and
the twenty-eight (28) days prior to and seven (7) days following any special
election. If the last day of registration falls on a state or federal holiday, the period
runs until the end of the next day which is not a Saturday or Sunday nor a state or
federal holiday. During the period that registration is closed, the county clerk may
accept and process registrations. Any voter who registers during the period that
registration is closed, except for any registered voter who transfers his or her
registration pursuant to KRS 116.085(2) or (3), shall not be permitted to vote in the
upcoming election.
(3) In all counties, the county clerk shall receive registrations, transfers, or changes of
party affiliation at branch offices at any place in the county during those periods
that the registration books are open except for those transfers pursuant to KRS
116.085(2) or 116.085(3). However, notice in the manner provided by KRS Chapter
424 shall be given at least three (3), but not more than fourteen (14), days in
advance of the time and place of any branch registration, and ten (10) days' written
notice shall be given to the county executive committee of each major political
party in the county in which the branch registration is to be held.
(4) Any person may register to vote or may change his or her party affiliation in any of
the following ways:
(a) In person;
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 6:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2433
(b) By mail;
(c) By means of the federal post card application, if the person is a resident of
Kentucky and a member of the Armed Forces, or a dependent of members of
the Armed Forces, or overseas citizen;
(d) By mail-in application form prescribed by the Election Assistance
Commission pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993; or
(e) By other methods of registration, or reregistration, approved by the State
Board of Elections, including the use of voluntary interested groups and
political parties, under the proper supervision and directions of the county
clerk, which may include door to door canvassing.
(5) Upon receipt of the form prescribed by the State Board of Elections or the Election
Assistance Commission pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993,
properly filled out and signed by the applicant, the county clerk shall:
(a) Verify with the United States Social Security Administration that the
applicant is a citizen of the United States; and
(b) If the applicant is verified as a United States citizen, register the applicant.
(6) Any individual or group shall have access to a reasonable number of voter
registration forms including the mail-in application form prescribed by the Election
Assistance Commission pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 in
the county clerk's office. The individual or group shall act under the proper
supervision and directions of the county clerk and shall return these completed
forms to the county clerk for official registration by the county clerk.
(7) No later than December 31, 1994, the Transportation Cabinet shall equip all driver's
license agencies to comply with the provisions of the National Voter Registration
Act of 1993. The Secretary of State shall provide assistance and interpretation to the
Transportation Cabinet in determining the requirements of the National Voter
Registration Act of 1993.
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 6:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2433
(8) The county clerk shall enter the specific party identification of the voter with a
political party, political organization, or political group as defined in KRS 118.015,
or independent status, as indicated by the voter on the voter registration form, into
the statewide voter registration system. The State Board of Elections shall
promulgate regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to provide for tracking of the
registration of voters identifying with political organizations and political groups as
defined in KRS 118.015, and voters of independent status.
(9) For purposes of voter registration, no county clerk, governmental body of any city,
county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified local
government, charter county government, or any employee thereof, shall accept any
private monetary funds to assist with voter registration activities unless accepted as
part of a valid contract for goods and services.
Section 2. KRS 116.095 is amended to read as follows:
The county clerk shall permit any citizen, at all reasonable hours, to inspect or make
copies of any registration record, without any fee. He or she shall, upon request, furnish
to any citizen a copy of the registration records, for which he or she may charge
necessary duplicating costs not to exceed fifty cents ($0.50) per page. [If ]A registered
voter's Social Security number [is ]included on his or her registration information[, the
Social Security number] shall be redacted by the county clerk before it is duplicated and
furnished to the citizen requesting the copy and before it is inspected or duplicated by the
citizen.
Section 3. KRS 116.155 is amended to read as follows:
All forms pertaining to registration shall be prescribed and furnished by the State Board
of Elections. The registration form shall include the voter's name; date of birth;
membership in a political party, political organization, or political group as defined in
KRS 118.015, or independent status; Social Security number[, if any]; mailing and
residence addresses, if different; and such other information as the State Board of
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 6:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2433
Elections may deem necessary.[ No person shall be denied the right to register because of
the failure to include his Social Security number.] All forms which require a voter's
signature shall provide for verification by the signer thereof.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 6:34 PM Jacketed